Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.005

"Voting system."

As used in this chapter, "voting system" means:

(1) The total combination of mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment including, but not limited to, the software, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support the equipment, that is used:

(a) To define ballots;

(b) To cast and count votes;

(c) To report or display election results from the voting system;

(d) To maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

(e) To perform an audit under RCW 29A.60.185; and

(2) The practices and associated documentation used:

(a) To identify system components and versions of such components;

(b) To test the system during its development and maintenance;

(c) To maintain records of system errors and defects;

(d) To determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the system; and

(e) To make available any materials to the voter such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots.

[ 2018 c 218 s 5; 2013 c 11 s 21; 2004 c 267 s 601.]

NOTES:

Intent—2018 c 218: See note following RCW 29A.60.185.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.